District of Columbia statutes.
1-1209

Other acts for use and effect beyond District.

Notaries public may also perform such other acts, for use and effect beyond the jurisdiction of the District, as according to the law of any state or territory of the United States or any foreign government in amity with the United States may be performed by notaries public.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1279, ch. 854, § 566
1981 Ed., § 1-809.
1973 Ed., § 1-510.